

 HANCOM SECURE Inc.



















HOME
KOREAN
JAPANESE








PRODUCT



Enterprise Key Management


Static Code Analyzer


DB Encryption


SSO/EAM/IM





COMPANY



About Us


Business Area


Certification


Customers


Partners


Contact Us






















 




















 Hancom Secure Inc.
9FL Hancom Tower, 49 Daewangpangyo-ro 644beon-gil, Bundang-gu, Seongnam-si, Gyeonggi-do, 13493, Republic of Korea
Tel : +82-31-622-6321  Fax: +82-31-622-6277  E-mail: overseas@hsecure.co.kr 
COPYRIGHT(C) Hancom Secure Inc. ALL RIGHTS RESERVED.


+ Family site
HANCOM
MDS Technology
HANCOM GMD









 HANCOM SECURE Inc.


















HOME
KOREAN
JAPANESE








PRODUCT



Enterprise Key Management


Static Code Analyzer


DB Encryption


SSO/EAM/IM





COMPANY



About Us


Business Area


Certification


Customers


Partners


Contact Us






















 

PRODUCT


Enterprise Key Management


Static Code Analyzer


DB Encryption


SSO/EAM/IM



Inquiry 
overseas@hsecure.co.kr+82-31-622-6321




Authentication/Encryption
 > PRODUCT > Authentication/Encryption




  HancomSecure AnySign for PCMarket leader of PKI encryption and authentication in Korea!Know-How proved by 900 client companies for 17 years
Overview
AnySign for PC is a Web encryption solution that performs authentication and encryption/decryption in various OS and browser environments. This non-ActiveX based product satisfies Web standards/Web accessibility/Discrimination Disability Act. 
 

Main Features

Security

Is equipped with a national certified encryption module (CMVP)
Utilizes Native library for important encryption modules 
Applies Anti-debugging and obfuscation

User Friendliness

Satisfies user friendliness and Web standards by using pure HTML/CSS UIs
Provides fast loading and no browser restriction 
Provides separate management per site 

Interoperability 

Interoperates with the present storage media of users (USB, HSM, HDD, etc.)
Provides interoperability with virtual keypad and keyboard security solutions to protect user inputs
Accepts the certificates of 5 national certification organizations, EPKI and GPKI, and interoperates with the certification organizations




HancomSecure Express-MultiNon-ActiveX based Web Mail Security Solution that guarantees secure transmission/reception of Web Mail System!
Overview
XecureExpress-Multi is a Web standard based Mail Security Solution that guarantees secure transmission and reception of user mail.  The product can guarantee confidentiality and integrity by using symmetric key based mail encryption.
 


Main Features

Proven Solution

Is equipped with a CMVP module 
Has been provided for many big client companies, such as public institutions and financial organizations 
Acquired national CMVP

Reliability 

Provides long term stability by optimizing resource usage 
Provides restoration and maintenance without losing any data by transmitting a full backup  
Guarantees high availability through FAQ, CDN, and load balancing in case of system failure 

Efficiency

Supports password based mail data encryption 
Secures stability by minimizing the usage of user PC resources 
Allows users to use any browser that supports JavaScript without installing any additional module by providing outputs in HTML 
Ensures efficiency of system process transmission by minimizing encrypted S/MIME data 

Portability

Provides various APIs that suit different mail transmission systems for stable interoperability with bulk mail transmission systems  
Supports stable installation and operation by satisfying international secure mail standards  
Has worked with domestic and international Email solution partners in many installations 




HancomSecure SmartDigital signature and authentication solution for smart devices
Overview
XecureSmart is a solution that processes digital signature and section encryption in various smart device environments. It improves security by performing authentication in a smart device after issuing a certificate directly to the device or interoperating with a mobile certificate relay system.
 


Main Features

Web section encryption and digital signature

Ensures security when transmitting important user information by utilizing section encryption between a Web server and a user terminal  
Supports various kinds of OS, such as iOS, Android and Window mobile  
Support hybrid user applications in C/S (Client/Server) and Web environments   
Acquired global compatibility by complying with national/international security standards  
Provides non-repudiation and data integrity by using digital signature 

Certification relay system (XecureCertshare)

Provides transmission channel encryption between a PC and a mobile (Ensures stability by using RSA 2048bit or higher)
Uses a NIS CMVP module
Supports various kinds of certificate (GPKI/NPKI/MPKI)

XecureKeyPad

Supports security functions that prevent the exposure and falsification of user inputs 
Prevents the exposure of user inputs by applying the patented “Index-based user authentication tool and principles” 
Supports the browsers of mobile devices as well as Web types (C/S and Web View) 




HancomSecure AppshieldProtect smartphone apps through smartphone rooting and jailbreaking detection, and counterfeiting/falsification prevention
Overview
XecureAppshield is an App counterfeiting/falsification prevention solution that prevents information leakage and the abuse of service through app counterfeiting/falsification detection installed in iphones and android phones.
 









Name
Functions


Client
- Detects app counterfeiting/falsification- Detects rooting and jailbreaking-	Prevents reversing through code obfuscation (Android : Allatori, iOS: Inline)-	Detects illegal processes through anti-debugging


Server
- Prevents counterfeiting/falsification through app integrity verification- Provides audit logs of illegal accessing from abnormal apps -	Sends SMS and email notifications to administrators and users when detecting counterfeiting and/or falsification- Verifies reliability through mutual authentication between a client and a server


Manager Server
- Provides convenient search functions by allowing various criteria, such as app name, access date, access IP, verification result, etc. from an administrator view- Provides setting and canceling functions for each app id and version- Supports administrator verification process upon app registration- Separates administrating operations that access a management server, and defines operations per user





Main Features

Usability

Improves security, performance and usability by implementing functions with a call 
Provides system establishment within 24 hours when no customizing is needed

Perfect prevention of app counterfeiting/falsification

Detects app counterfeiting/falsification based on server-generated random values and integrity policy  
Guarantees secure service through security token, code obfuscation (min: Allatori demo version), external process check, etc  
Ensures omnidirectional security and prevents replay attacks through KDF functions 

Simple management environment

Provides real-time email alarms 
Provides setting and canceling functions for each app id and version
Separates administrating operations that access a management server, and defines operations per user
Supports administrator verification process upon app registration
Supports dashboards



  











 Hancom Secure Inc.
9FL Hancom Tower, 49 Daewangpangyo-ro 644beon-gil, Bundang-gu, Seongnam-si, Gyeonggi-do, 13493, Republic of Korea
Tel : +82-31-622-6321  Fax: +82-31-622-6277  E-mail: overseas@hsecure.co.kr 
COPYRIGHT(C) Hancom Secure Inc. ALL RIGHTS RESERVED.


+ Family site
HANCOM
MDS Technology
HANCOM GMD








 HANCOM SECURE Inc.


















HOME
KOREAN
JAPANESE








PRODUCT



Enterprise Key Management


Static Code Analyzer


DB Encryption


SSO/EAM/IM





COMPANY



About Us


Business Area


Certification


Customers


Partners


Contact Us






















 

PRODUCT


Enterprise Key Management


Static Code Analyzer


DB Encryption


SSO/EAM/IM



Inquiry 
overseas@hsecure.co.kr+82-31-622-6321




Enterprise Key Management
 > PRODUCT > Enterprise Key Management




 As a
sponsor member of OASIS and a member of KMIP Technical Committee, 
Hancom Secure is working in various fields of activity for international key management standards. For more information,  


Key Management Interoperability Protocol: 




https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Key_Management_Interoperability_Protocol

 


KMIP Implementations known to the KMIP TC:



https://
wiki.oasis-open.org/kmip/KnownKMIPImplementations

 


KMIP Interoperability: 



Hancom Secure participated in the OASIS KMIP Interop at RSA2017 and tested with all participating KMIP servers and clients. 









HancomSecure KeyManager Server
HancomSecure KeyManager Client






Cryptsoft C Client
Cryptsoft Java Client
Cryptsoft C# Client
Cryptsoft C++ Client
Cryptsoft Python Client
Fornetix Key Orchestration Client
Oracle Solaris
Quintessence Labs qClient




Cryptsoft C Server
Cryptsoft Java Server
Fronetix Key Orchestration Server
HPE ESKM
IBM SKLM
Kryptus kNET HSM
Quintessence Labs qCrypt
SafeNet KeySecure








Hancom Secure Integration testing with the P6R SKC Secure KMIP Client in April 2017 













 Hancom Secure Inc.
9FL Hancom Tower, 49 Daewangpangyo-ro 644beon-gil, Bundang-gu, Seongnam-si, Gyeonggi-do, 13493, Republic of Korea
Tel : +82-31-622-6321  Fax: +82-31-622-6277  E-mail: overseas@hsecure.co.kr 
COPYRIGHT(C) Hancom Secure Inc. ALL RIGHTS RESERVED.


+ Family site
HANCOM
MDS Technology
HANCOM GMD







































MD-Series Mobile Forensic Solution, HancomGMD Inc.























The global B2B marketplace to source Korean products
Bookmark BuyKOREA


Join Free
Sign in
my buyKOREA
FAQ
about buyKOREA









For Buyer
For Seller








All







Search


All
Product
Buying Offer
Image
Business Events
FAQ















KOREAN Products

All Products
Global Business Partnering
Global Procurement Challenge
Power-Tech Korea 2017
Korea Service Market 2017
Consumer Goods Showcase
CHINA HIGHWAY Products
Promising Products
EU KPP Products
Power products
ITS products
New Products
Creative Startup Products
[Team Korea] Products
World Champ Products


Buying Offer
KOPS Pay
EMS Shipment
Business Events
Video Meeting























Product Category


Automobiles & Vehicles 



													
												Automobiles 



													
												Auto Parts 



													
												Motorcycles, Bicycles & Parts 



													
												Railway Vehicles & Parts 



													
												Elevators & Escalators 



													
												Ships, Ocean Structures & Parts 



													
												Airplanes & Parts 



													
												Spaceships & Parts 




Electronic Components



													
												Semiconductors 



													
												Electron Tubes 



													
												Passive Components 



													
												Electro-Mechanical Components 



													
												Batteries 



													
												Flat-Panel Displays & Sensors 



													
												Other Electronic Components 




Chemicals & Pharmaceuticals 



													
												Basic Petrochemicals 



													
												Petrochemical Intermediate Materials 



													
												Materials for Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Synthetic Resin 



													
												Synthetic Rubber 



													
												Other Petrochemicals 



													
												Dyestuffs & Pigment 



													
												Paint, Varnish & Ink 



													
												Adhesives 



													
												Surfactants 



													
												Photographic/Cinematographic Materials 



													
												Agrochemicals & Phamaceuticals 



													
												Fine Chemical Materials 



													
												Other Fine Chemicals 



													
												Nitrogen Fertilizer 



													
												Phosphate Fertilizer 



													
												Potassium Fertilizer 



													
												Compound Fertilizer 



													
												Other Fertilizer 



													
												Other Chemical Industry Products 




Electronics, Computers & Telecommunication 



													
												Wired Communication Equipments 



													
												Wireless Communication Equipments 



													
												Computers 



													
												Industrial Electronics



													
												Measurement, Control & Analysis Instruments 



													
												Video Devices 



													
												Audio Devices 



													
												Refrigerators 



													
												Home Appliances 



													
												Electro-Thermal Appliances 



													
												Lighting 



													
												Electronic Watches/Clocks & Game Players 



													
												ICT Solutions



													
												Other Household Appliances 




Minerals, Glass & Ceramics 



													
												Gold, Silver & Platinum 



													
												Iron Ore 



													
												Copper Ore 



													
												Aluminum Ore 



													
												Tin Ore 



													
												Zinc Ore 



													
												Nickel Ore 



													
												Other Metal Ore



													
												Graphite 



													
												Salt



													
												Kaolin 



													
												Limestone 



													
												Other Non-Metallic Minerals 



													
												Crude Oil 



													
												Coal 



													
												Petroleum Products 



													
												Liquided Petroleum Gas 



													
												Uranium 



													
												Cement



													
												Tiles & Ceramics 



													
												Glassware



													
												Other Ceramics 



													
												Asbestos Products 



													
												Mica Products 



													
												Other Mineral Products 




Metals & Metal Products 



													
												Section Shape Steel 



													
												Wire Rod, Bar Steel & Reinforcement 



													
												Steel Sheet 



													
												Steel Pipes & Steel Wire 



													
												Rails & Steel Structures 



													
												Steel Containers & Chain 



													
												Cast & Forged 



													
												Ferroalloy, Pig Iron & Iron Scrap 



													
												Semi-Finished Steel Products & Other Steel Products 



													
												Aluminum Products 



													
												Copper Products 



													
												Nickel Products 



													
												Magnesium Products 



													
												Lead Products 



													
												Zinc Products 



													
												Tin Products 



													
												Tungsten,  Molybdenum & Manganese Products 



													
												Other Nonferrous Metal Products 



													
												Coins 



													
												Nails 



													
												Containers 



													
												Other Steel & Metal Products




Machinery 



													
												Engines, Turbines & Pumps 



													
												Conveyors & Load/Unload Machines 



													
												Air Conditioners & Coolers/Heaters 



													
												Office Machines 



													
												Optical Instruments 



													
												Textile Machinery & Chemical Instruments 



													
												Wood/Mineral/Glass Working Machinery 



													
												Metal Working Machinery 



													
												Food Processing/Packaging Machinery 



													
												Construction & Mining Machinery 



													
												Rolling Mills, Welding Machines & Casting Machinery 



													
												Paper-Making & Printing Machinery 



													
												Agricultural Machinery 



													
												Other Industrial Machines 



													
												Watches & Clocks 



													
												Semiconductor Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Plotters 



													
												Surveying Instruments 



													
												Flat-Panel Display Manufacturing Equipments 



													
												Other Machinery 




Textiles & Leather Products 



													
												Leather



													
												Leather Products 



													
												Synthetic Fiber 



													
												Regenerated Fiber 



													
												Natural Fiber Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Filament Yarn 



													
												Synthetic Fiber Spun Yarn 



													
												Silk Fabric 



													
												Wool Fabric 



													
												Cotton Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Filament Fabric 



													
												Synthetic Staple Fiber Fabric 



													
												Knitted Fabric 



													
												Other Fabric 



													
												Garments & Clothes 



													
												Other Textile Products 



													
												Fur 




Rubber & Plastic



													
												Plastic Products 



													
												Rubber Products 




Electric Equipments 



													
												Generators & Motors 



													
												Static Electric Equipmemts 



													
												Renewable Energy



													
												Heavy Electric Equipments 



													
												Electric Wires 




Mechanical Parts & Tools 



													
												Friction Products 



													
												Grinding Products 



													
												Mechanical Elements 



													
												Tools 



													
												Dies 




Agriculture & Fishery



													
												Cereal & Fruit 



													
												Live Plants 



													
												Vegetable Matter 



													
												Vegetable Materials 



													
												Favorite Food 



													
												Processed Agricultural Products 



													
												Seeds 



													
												Other Agricultural/Farm Products 



													
												Live Animals 



													
												Meat 



													
												Animal By-Products 



													
												Processed Livestock Products 



													
												Animal Hair 



													
												Wood & Timber 



													
												Tree Seeds 



													
												Forest By-Products 



													
												Fish 



													
												Crustaceans 



													
												Mollusks 



													
												Seaweed 



													
												Fish Meat & Roe 



													
												Processed Fishery Products 



													
												Fishery By-Products 



													
												Other Fishery Products 




Pulp, Paper & Printing 



													
												Paper Materials 



													
												Paper Products 



													
												Books 



													
												Periodical Publications 



													
												Maps 



													
												Other Printouts 




Beauty & Living Ware



													
												Umbrellas & Parasols 



													
												Bags 



													
												Belts 



													
												Portable Accessories 



													
												Home/Living Ware



													
												Nail



													
												Cosmetics, Soap & Toothpaste 



													
												Flatware Sets 



													
												Jewels(Jewelry) 



													
												Beauty Accessories 



													
												Imitation Jewelry 



													
												Wigs & Fake Eyebrows 



													
												Other Personal Items 




Furniture



													
												Chairs



													
												Beds



													
												Tables



													
												Desks



													
												Wardrobes, Dressing Tables & Storage Drawers 



													
												Other Furniture




Sports, Hobbies & Toys 



													
												Footwear 



													
												Piano



													
												Strings



													
												Wind Instruments 



													
												Percussion Instruments 



													
												Musical Instrument Parts & Accessories 



													
												Other Musical Instruments 



													
												Sport Products 



													
												Hobbies & Entertainment 



													
												Dolls 



													
												Riding Toys 



													
												Self-Assembly Toys 



													
												Other Toys 




Eyewear



													
												Eyeglasses 



													
												Contact Lens 




Office & School Supplies



													
												Writing Supplies 



													
												Art & Drafting Supplies 



													
												Office Supplies 



													
												Other Office & School Supplies 




Gifts & Crafts



													
												Artificial Flowers 



													
												Shell Crafts 



													
												Glass Crafts 



													
												Other Crafts 



													
												Paintings 



													
												Sculptures 



													
												Stamps 



													
												Antiques 



													
												Other Gifts & Crafts 




Health & Medical



													
												Health & Medical Devices



													
												Health & Medical Supplies




Environment



													
												Recycling



													
												Water Treatment



													
												Waste Management



													
												Air quality Management



													
												Other environmental products




Others 



													
												Other Miscellaneous Products 



													
												Engineering, Procurement and Construction



													
												Services




SEE ALL CATEGORIES















Home > Product Detail



Others 
				>
				
Other Miscellaneous Products 
Engineering, Procurement and Construction
Services

				>
				
Other Miscellaneous Products 




MD-Series Mobile Forensic Solution(Pd No. : 3043343)
(Updated : 10/15/2015)
























product information






Model Nm
MD-RED, MD-NEXT, MD-Box, MD-Reader


HS CODE
852349


M.O.Q
1 copy, 1 SET


Ceritification




Keywords
Mobile forensics, Data extraction, Data analysis, Data recovery, Digital forensics, MD-Series


Seller ID
hancomgmd






Inquiry Now
Video Meeting











Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event


MD-Series are Mobile forensic hardware and software bundles

MD-NEXT is the forensic software for the data extraction of mobile devices.
MD-Extractor S can acquire data from Android devices, iOS devices and Windows phone devices with physical and logical extraction methods. Chip-offed flash memory with MD-Reader, JTAG interfaced mainboard with MD-Box, physical Android image carving by GMD-ROM and other cutting-edge reverse engineering technologies are fused into MD-Extractor S. 
 
MD-RED is the next-generation forensic software for the recovery, analysis and reporting of the extracted data from mobile devices. Mobile data image extracted from MD-Extractor S can be opened in MD-RED program. After selection of partition, directory or apps, the recovery and analysis can be executed to get the evidential information. Finally, all the results of analysis is exported to the forensic reports and can help the investigation of crimes and accidents.

MD-Box is the hardware device for reading data directly from the mainboard of mobile phone using JTAG interface.

MD-Reader is the hardware device for reading data directly from the memory chip detached from the mainboard of mobile phone.





Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event




Company Information


company information












Contact Person
 Jessy Jun


Company
 HancomGMD Inc.


Address
 5F, HancomTower,49, Daewangpangyo-ro 644beon-gil  Bundang-gu, Seongnam-si


Homepage

www.hancomgmd.com
										
									
								
								
				  				
						  			, 
							  		
							  		http://seller.buykorea.org/hancomgmd--1004235



Tel
 0316226111
Fax
 0316226112


Biz. Type
 Manufacturing
Est. Year

								 
									1997
								
								
								


Employees
 11~50









Company Profile


Company Profile






About Company

        							
          							HancomGMD is the worldwide leading research group of mobile forensics. The company has been dedicated in developing mobile forensic solution covering the widest range of mobile devices running Android, iOS, Windows Phone, and other operating systems. More than 70 national agencies are using MD-series to investigate crimes and accidents. And as the future business roadmap, we are extending our business to new digital forensics like video forensics and document forensics. In 2005, HancomGMD has been merged with Dawintek, which is listd in KOSDAQ(077280) and has become one of Hancom Group.Based on the business infrastructure and an aggressive investment from Hancom Group, HancomGMD is doing its every effort to pioneer the overseas mobile forensic market.As a result, HancomGMD has exported MD-Series into Japan, Hongkong, Singapore and Iran. Moreover, we are expanding the partnership in China and India.
								


Company History
1997.01 : Dawintek Inc. established2005.05 : Samsung Electronics “ASIC Design Partner” agreement2010.02 : GMDSYSTEM Inc. established2010.10 : Smartphone analysis tool, MD-Smart V1.0 released2010.11 : National Procecutors, Army forece mobile forensics project2011.06 : Acquired the patents on data extraction device and data analysis system2011.08 : Supplied MD-Series to Police agnecies in national wide 16 offices2013.03 : Contracted with Japan AOS technical licensing2014.05 : Exported MD-Series to Iran, Hongkong police2014.11 : Attended World Foresic Festival2015.05 : M&A between Dawintek and GMDSYSTEM, re-listed in KOSDAQ as HancomGMD2015.08 : Contracted with Chinese distribution partner2015.09 : Supplied MD-Series to National Prosecutors offices





View all products of this company




Other Products from [ hancomgmd ] (1)
View all















									
										
											MD-LIVE·NEXT·MD-RED / MD-MED...
										
										
									
								









Product Description
Company Information
Related Business Event



Related Business Event List







(추경) 중남미 민관합동사절단

2015-11-19 ~ 2015-11-30


(추경) 중남미 민관합동사절단

2015-11-19 ~ 2015-11-30


GSMA Mobile World Congress 2016

2016-02-22 ~ 2016-02-25


Korea Service and Content Market 2016 (KSCM 2016) 

2016-10-18 ~ 2016-10-19


Korea Service Market 2017
COEX B2
2017-06-15 ~ 2017-06-16


Global Business Partnering Week
KINTEX 1 Exhibition Hall 5
2016-11-30 ~ 2016-11-30














Inquiry




- Please leave a detailed inquiry to get an accurate reply from the Korean seller.



Inquiry Sample




Inquiry






To
HancomGMD Inc.


CC

 You are able to send one CC-mail ONLY



Message





Price Quote









SEND
























What is buyKOREA?
buyKOREA Guide
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy


Copyright (c) 2004 all rights reserved, buyKOREA.org.
Global B2B e-marketplace, operated by KOTRA, enabling KOPS payment & EMS delivery.
KOTRA: (06792) 13, Heolleung-ro, Seocho-gu, Seoul, Korea (Tel. +82-1600-7119)





KOTRA Family Site
------------------------
KOTRA 홈페이지
KOTRA 해외시장뉴스
GEP
Invest Korea


















CUSTOMER CENTER


FAQ
Q&A






QUICK MENU

















 
















  077280:KOSDAQ Stock Quote - Hancom GMD Inc - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Hancom GMD Inc   077280:KS   KOSDAQ        2,825.00KRW   40.00   1.44%     As of 2:50 AM EDT 8/3/2017     Open   2,750.00    Day Range   2,720.00 - 3,255.00    Volume   208,715    Previous Close   2,785.00    52Wk Range   2,500.00 - 4,550.00    1 Yr Return   6.60%                   


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Open   2,750.00    Day Range   2,720.00 - 3,255.00    Volume   208,715    Previous Close   2,785.00    52Wk Range   2,500.00 - 4,550.00    1 Yr Return   6.60%    YTD Return   -7.98%    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   62.99    Earnings per Share (KRW) (TTM)   45    Market Cap (b KRW)   31.728    Shares Outstanding  (m)   11.231    Price/Sales (TTM)   1.85    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector  Industrials   % Price Change +0.03%     Industry Commercial & Professional Services   % Price Change +0.11%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Hancom GMD Inc. produces Application Specific Integrated Circuit (ASIC),  which is a customized integrated circuit.  The Company provides product as a electronic component for LCD monitor, cellular phone, and digital information system.    Address  49 Daewangpangyo-ro 644 BeongiBundang-guSeoul, KoreaKorea, Republic of (South)   Phone  82-31-622-6111   Website   www.dawintech.com     Executives Board Members    Kim Sang-Chul  Chairman/CEO    Kim Hyun-Soo  Rep Director    Lee Kyung-Soo  Managing Director    Byun Sung-Jun  Executive Director    Kim Yeon-Su  Executive Director     Show More         




Hyun-Soo Kim - Chief Executive Officer & Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Hyun-Soo Kim
Chief Executive Officer & Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.



Overview
Relationships Paths
Education Career History Boards & Committees 


Hyun-Soo Kim
Chief Executive Officer & Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.



 Overview



Age



45
                                  (Born 10/1971)
                                              




Notable Companies


GMD System Co., Ltd.

Hancom GMD, Inc.




Board Seats



1





Number of Relationships



                This person is connected to 11 people.
              






 Relationships
              See Details




Han-Joon Kim

Former Senior Executive Director & Head-Finance at Hancom GMD, Inc.




Sang-Cheol Kim

President at Hancom, Inc.





Gyeong-Rae Kim

Outside Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.




Sung-Jun Byeon

Senior Executive Director at Hancom, Inc.





Yeon-Soo Kim

Director & Head-Global Business at Hancom, Inc.




Hae-Dong Lee

President-Korea Office at FLIR Systems Korea Co., Ltd.





Chan-Ho Kim

Former Co-Chief Executive Officer & Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.




Jae-Hyeong Heo

Former Director, Vice President & Head-Sales at Hancom GMD, Inc.





Gyung-Soon Cho

Former Outside Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.




Seung-Ho Han

Auditor at Hancom GMD, Inc.







See 1 more listing with RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See 1 More 


 


 Paths to Hyun-Soo Kim



            Hyun-Soo Kim          




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Hyun-Soo Kim






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Hyun-Soo Kim.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Educational Background



 


Kyungpook National University

                  The highest value that a university must pursue as a hall of learning, meaning that it strives to seek the truth without hesitation.                





 Career History



Chief Executive Officer

                                    2010 - Current                


GMD System Co., Ltd.


                  Part of Hancom GMD, Inc., GMD System Co., Ltd. is a South Korean company located in Seoul. The firm operates as computer data restoring service provider. Hyun-Soo Kim is the current CEO, occupying that position since 2010. On 04 Feb 15 Hancom GMD, Inc. acquired GMD System Co., Ltd. for $8.34 million.                




Chief Executive Officer & Director

                                    Current                


Hancom GMD, Inc.


                  Hancom GMD, Inc. engages in the design, manufacture and sale of integrated circuits. It provides application specific integrated circuit (ASIC) design solution services which include products such as drive controller ICs for plasma display panels (PDPs), timing controller ICs for thin film transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD) and digital device ICs for optical mouse sensors. In addition, it also offers system on chip (SoC) design services. The company was founded on January 30, 1997 and is headquartered in Seongnam, South Korea.                





 Boards & Committees



Corporate Boards ▾




Chief Executive Officer & Director

                    Current                  


Hancom GMD, Inc.

                    Hancom GMD, Inc. engages in the design, manufacture and sale of integrated circuits. It provides application specific integrated circuit (ASIC) design solution services which include products such as drive controller ICs for plasma display panels (PDPs), timing controller ICs for thin film transistor-liquid crystal displays (TFT-LCD) and digital device ICs for optical mouse sensors. In addition, it also offers system on chip (SoC) design services. The company was founded on January 30, 1997 and is headquartered in Seongnam, South Korea.                  





 Other Affiliations




              Hyun-Soo Kim is affiliated with
                            GMD System Co., Ltd., Hancom GMD, Inc., Hancom GMD, Inc..
            




You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.












Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤
















            Companies - Electrical and Nuclear equipment- South KoreaㅣKompass Business Directory -
                    Page 14



































































                    Company directory and business data solutions



About Kompass







                                        Register






                                        Login







                                                    Login
×



                                                    Please fill in your login and password







Register
Login


Forgot your password ?


























								English

























Need advice?
Please contact one of our team of experts from Monday to Friday between 9am and 5pm or by email




+82 2 2200 0800





Contact us











                    Search across 10.5 million selected companies  in more than  60 countries.

















or




all
suppliers
one company











Rechercher















                                    Data Access



Business solutions 
Sales leads? Online promotion?


EasyBusiness
Direct Marketing
EasyList

                                   Digital solutions
Booster
Promotional solutions
Register your company




See all business solutions

Videos & Tutorials

Quizz




EasyBusiness
Find the right sales leads!

                                With more than 10.5 million companies and 60 search criteria, our global B2B database, EasyBusiness, will help you find the right customer leads and marketing lists.
Find out more >


EasyList
Need help with finding prospects?
EasyList is our straightforward on demand tool designed to help you build personalised company lists from a global database of 9 million companies.
Find out more


Direct Marketing
The precision tool designed to help you find new prospects!
This powerful tool will help you refine and focus your prospecting activities, with many features to help improve the impact of your sales and marketing campaigns.
Find out more >


Register your company
Build your free company profile!
If you are looking to expand into new markets or want to grow your sales activity, then register your company free of charge on the global Kompass B2B directory.
Find out more >


Booster
Engage your target audience!
Engage your target audience and attract new business leads using the Kompass.com our global online digital directory. With over 6m visitors per month from 69 countries worldwide, let us improve your SEO and increase your customer traffic.
Find out more >


Promotional solutions
Attract relevant enquiries!
Build, enhance and manage your company profile to attract visitors instantly. Use our PPC experts to help drive relevant enquiries through to your profile – cost effective, managed and GUARANTEED.
Find out more >


















Electrical and Nuclear equipment - Page 14





                    Electrical equipment. Nuclear equipment





                        South Korea













Busan (48)

Chungcheongbuk-do (39)

Chungcheongnam-do (77)

Daegu (29)

Daejeon (23)

Gangwon-do (11)

Gwangju (29)

Gyeonggi-do (495)

Gyeongsangbuk-do (27)

Gyeongsangnam-do (40)

Incheon (80)

Jeju-do (1)

Jeollabuk-do (25)

Jeollanam-do (9)

Seoul (360)

Ulsan (9)


1






Electrical, Electronics  & Optical








Accumulators, batteries, secondary cells, by use South Korea (53)

Accumulators, batteries and secondary cells South Korea (31)

Antistatic equipment South Korea (5)

Battery chargers South Korea (49)

Busbars South Korea (8)

Capacitors, by use South Korea (12)

Capacitors, fixed South Korea (29)

Capacitors, variable South Korea (8)

Circuit breakers South Korea (33)

Commutator switches South Korea (33)

Components and accessories for electric lighting fixtures South Korea (35)

Components and accessories for fuses South Korea (12)

Components for batteries and accumulators South Korea (7)

Components for electric transformers South Korea (7)

Components for solenoids, reactance and induction coils South Korea (5)

Demagnetising systems South Korea (1)

Display boards, electric South Korea (10)

Earthing equipment South Korea (9)

Electrical industry contractors South Korea (57)

Electrical insulating materials South Korea (6)

Electrical insulators South Korea (7)



Electrical protection systems NES South Korea (12)

Electric cables, insulated South Korea (55)

Electric cables, insulated, by use South Korea (19)

Electric clamping tools South Korea (1)

Electric conductors South Korea (7)

Electric connectors South Korea (62)

Electric contactors South Korea (16)

Electric controllers South Korea (26)

Electric drilling tools South Korea (4)

Electric fastening tools South Korea (8)

Electric generators South Korea (39)

Electric generator sets South Korea (28)

Electric grinding tools South Korea (2)

Electric lamps South Korea (119)

Electric lamps, by use South Korea (88)

Electric lamps, portable South Korea (34)

Electric lighting equipment, indoor South Korea (47)

Electric lighting equipment, indoor, by type South Korea (43)

Electric lighting equipment, outdoor South Korea (55)

Electric lighting equipment, outdoor, by type South Korea (26)

Electric lighting equipment, security South Korea (32)

Electric plugs and sockets South Korea (38)

Electric power supplies South Korea (100)

Electric regulators South Korea (53)



Electric relays South Korea (21)

Electric sanding and polishing tools South Korea (3)

Electric sawing tools South Korea (6)

Electric signs South Korea (20)

Electric starters South Korea (9)

Electric substations and switch- boxes South Korea (17)

Electric switches South Korea (65)

Electric tapping tools South Korea (3)

Electric terminals South Korea (14)

Electric tools NES South Korea (3)

Electric wires, insulated South Korea (23)

Electric wires, non-insulated South Korea (11)

Electromagnetic separators South Korea (4)

Electromagnets South Korea (8)

Electromechanical converters South Korea (48)

Fuses South Korea (11)

Grid connecting equipment South Korea (9)

Isolating switches South Korea (6)

Isotopes South Korea (1)

Junction boxes South Korea (6)

Lighting equipment, fibre optics South Korea (28)

Lighting equipment, light emitting diode (LED) South Korea (184)

Machinery and equipment for electrical goods production South Korea (31)

Magnetic and electromagnetic shielding materials South Korea (9)



Nuclear engineering contractors South Korea (4)

Nuclear engineering plant, installations and equipment South Korea (16)

Nuclear fuels South Korea (1)

Particle accelerator equipment South Korea (11)

Permanent magnets South Korea (21)

Power line cable and wire fittings South Korea (49)

Primary cells South Korea (4)

Reactance and induction coils South Korea (24)

Rectifiers South Korea (15)

Resistors South Korea (21)

Rheostats South Korea (2)

Solenoids South Korea (7)

Spare parts and accessories for electric rotary machines and converters South Korea (14)

Surge arresters South Korea (24)

Switchboards South Korea (27)

Transformer booths South Korea (10)

Transformers and auto-transformers South Korea (48)

Transformers and auto-transformers, by use South Korea (37)


1
2
3
4




1323 

                            Companies match your search criteria



 

Buy this prospect list





x


Every month we have millions of visitors on Kompass, looking for companies like yours. Register your company on Kompass and build your FREE company profile to attract those visitors.


Register


Login


Login


















Yaskawa Electric Korea Corp.
Manufacture & Export of Motion&Controll Inverter RobotManufacture & Export ofServo,Controller,Inverter,RobotManufacture & Export ...
Seoul, South Korea












Daeha Cable Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Degaussing Coil TransformerManufacture & Export ofWire Harness,Connector,Cable,Degaussing Coil,Transformer,...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Pacific Metals Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Alnico - Cast Magnets - Sintered Magnets - Powder, Bonded Magnets Ferrite - Powder - Wet Type Magnets - Dry ...
Seoul, South Korea












Won Ik Corporation
Manufacture & Export of Quartz Sector - Quartz - Ceramics Trading Sector - Medical Equipment- Industrial Materials - Lighting ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Myungin Corporation
Manufacture & Export of Generators, Power Supply
Seoul, South Korea












ENTEC ELECTRIC & ELECTRONIC CO., LTD
IntroductionENTEC Electic & Electronic Co., Ltd was established under the goal ofbecoming th world best technology enterprise in the ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












WOOJIN ELECTRIC CO., LTD.
Manufacture & Export of Amorphous Core(4L5L) Amorphous Core(Evans)Manufacture & Export ofAmorphous CoreManufacture & Export of32801 / ...
Chungcheongbuk-do, South Korea












Sangwon Electric Co.Ltd
Manufacture & Export of Circuit Protector Dc Contactor Fuse Holder Trip Coil Assembly Magnatic Contactor Magnatic Switch Circuit ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea












SUNGHO ELECTRONICS CORP.
Manufacture & Export of Polyester Film Capapcitor, Noninductive Film Polyester Film,Tin Foil,Adhesive TapeManufacture & Export ofFilm ...
Seoul, South Korea












Ecoenergy Holdings Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of LED 3D Media Software Hands FreeManufacture & Export ofAudio and visual equipment, Audio and visual equipment,...
Seoul, South Korea












Kyungsung Electric Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofSMPS, Sensor, Control Box
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












joongwon electric corp.
Manufacture & Export of Etching -Auto Section Swictch -Current Limiting Fuse -Cutout Switch -Fuse Link -Glbs -Power Line Fuse -St6 Gas...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












feel industrial engineering co., ltd
IntroductionHYDRAULIC BREAKER : Silenced type FINE X SERIES can show stronger power in any circumstance with perfect harmony of oil ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












LEDON
Manufacture & Export of Manufacture of LED illuminations
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












GigaLane.co.,Ltd
Manufacture & Export of Connectors - Panel Mount - Cable Connectors Adapter Other Components- Dc Blocks - Bias Tees Cable Assembly - ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












LEDST Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of 1.Plant growth light:Plant growth light can contro 2.High Colour Rendering Index:HCRI means that ligh t is ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea












Hansung Eng Co Ltd
Manufacture & Export of Industrial Press Transfer Machine Die Casting Coil Winder
Seoul, South Korea












BIOLIGHT
Manufacture of Electric Lamps and Bulbs
Gyeongsangbuk-do, South Korea












KYONG BO ELECTRIC CO.,LTD.
Manufacture & Export of Electrical Indicating Instruments, Power Transducer,Protective RelayConverter/InverterManufacture & Export ...
Seoul, South Korea












Emerson Process Management Korea Limited.
Manufacture & Export of Measurement & Analytical Instruments - Pressure, Temperature, Level,& Flow Measurement - Liquid Analyzers - ...
Seoul, South Korea












SHIN YOUNG ELECTRIC.CO.,LTD.
Manufacture & Export of Pole Mounted Transformer Pad Mounted Transformer Power Transformer Distribution Transformer Dry Type ...
Busan, South Korea












YUWON Ener-Tech
Manufacture & Export of Manufacture & export of Manufacture and sale of LED Lights and related products.
Seoul, South Korea












SHIN HWA ELECTRIC WIRE CO., LTD
Manufacture & Export of Electronics & Electronical PartManufacture & Export ofWier,CableManufacture & Export of32803 / Manufacture of ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












OLT
Manufacture & Export of[Digital Free Voltage Regulator] Digital Free Voltage Regulator is implemented with DSP chip by using All IGBT ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Eastern Technology Inc.
Manufacture & Export of1) eCAM/Pro II 2) eCAM/HH 3) eCAM/MP 4) eCAM/SS 5) DATA base
Seoul, South Korea












SHINHAN PHOTONICS CO.,LTD.
Manufacture of Spectacle, Photographic Equipment and Other Optical Instruments
Gwangju, South Korea












Cheil Electric Wiring Devices Co., Ltd.
Manufacture of Electric Motors, Generators and Transforming, Distributing and Controlling Apparatus of Electricity
Busan, South Korea












Ye-eun Tech Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Connectors Adaptors Cable Assemblies Passive Components Active Components Cables - Semi-Rigid - Semi-Flexible ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












QLIGHT CO., LTD.
Manufacture & Export ofQLight is a world-leading provider of visual and audible status indicating systems and solutions since 1992. We...
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea












Prewell Corporation
Manufacture & Export of Optic Transponder Opic Passive - General Patch Cords - Fixed Attenuator - Variable Attenuator - Single Mode ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Samwon Tech Co., Ltd
Manufacture & Export of - Temperature & Humidity Controller - Digital Indicator - Programmable Controller - Limit ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Atico Korea Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Brass photo frame, Brassware, Cosmetic brush, Plastic tableware, Terra cotta picture frameManufacture & Export...
Seoul, South Korea












AULT KOREA CORPORATION
Manufacture & Export of Smps Linear Power Supply - Regulated - Unegulated - Transformers Battery Chargers External Smps Medical Units ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












YUHAN PROTECH CO., LTD
Manufacture & Export of Automobile Parts - Connectors - Water Proof Connectors Electric/Electronic Parts - Fuse Holder - LCD Back ...
Incheon, South Korea












SHIN DONG A ELECTRIC CORPORATION
Manufacture & Export of Rich Series Noble Series Weatherproof World Series New Symphony HomePanel Board Cord Multi-Tap Small Switch ...
Busan, South Korea












COWELL FASHION Co., Ltd.
IntroductionPilkor is One of the leading manufacturer of Film Capacitor and MetalFilm Resistor in Korea. The main application is all ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












SangShin ELECOM CO.,LTD.
Manufacture & Export of Mobile Communication Component - DR Filters - LC Filters - MonoblockFilters - Cavity Filters - Dielectric ...
Sejong-si, South Korea












HANSHIN ELECTRIC WIRE CO.,LTD
Manufacture & Export of Tele Communlcation Cable Bare Copper Wire Aluminum Wire Cords Insulated Wire Power Cable Wires For Automobiles...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Han Ju Mool San Co. Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Voltage Regulators, Voltage Reducer, Fluorescent Lamp
Gangwon-do, South Korea












Dong Young Industrial.CO.LTD
Manufacture & Export of Caliper Piston Solenoid Switch Head Drum Differential Gear Other Forgings Cold forging such as gears and other...
Daejeon, South Korea












Nambu Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Vacuum Cleaner Industrial Vacuum Multifunctional air gun Vacuum Gun Hand held air powered vacuum gun ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












For Nature Co., LTD.
Manufacture & Export of RechargeableBattery Formation&Test System Solution EDLC System Solution Power SupplyManufacture & Export ...
Seoul, South Korea












MoonMyung Co.Ltd
Manufacture & Export of - Construction Field - Switch Board Field - Precision Processing Field - Painting FieldManufacture & Export ...
Daegu, South Korea












TAEIN CO.,LTD
Manufacture & Export of _ Power Leakage BreakerManufacture & Export ofCircuit BreakerManufacture & Export of32801 / Manufacture of ...
Chungcheongbuk-do, South Korea












J.C COM
Manufacture & Export of _ - Jelly - Fire Stop System - Rope Grease - Swellable Tape - Swellable Yarn - Ferrule - Optical Connector - ...
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea












Ehwa Technologies Information Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofRectifier Transfomer Inverter Battery Charger Uninterruptible Power Supply(UPS) Units,Battery Chargers,...
Seoul, South Korea












Daeryuk Technology Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofDAERYUK TECHNOLOGY LTD.is the manufacturer of LED display and LED lighting in Korea. We can supply all kinds of...
Seoul, South Korea












TOPEX
Manufacture & Export of And - Video Magnifier - Video Presenter - Flex Vision - Overhead Projector - Camscan - Microscopic Projector -...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Phoenix Engineering Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Domestic Demand U.S.A Exported Articles Japan Exported ArticlesManufacture & Export ofElectronic Ballast
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












FDC Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Rupture disc Rupture disks Explosion panel N2 Blanketing system Emergency relef hatchManufacture & Export ...
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea












Namjunsa Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofElectronic Watt hour meter, Static Meter, AMI , OMR, wireless meter reading, Electricity Meter Nam-Jun secure ...
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea












WINPOWERTECH
Manufacture & Export ofwind power generator, PMG , wind power turbine, Permanent magnet generator Development and manufacturing of ...
Busan, South Korea












Intelligent Digital Integrated Security Co.. Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofWe have state of the art system and equipment to provide the best quality, delivery and condition for our ...
DAEJEON, South Korea












KI CABLE Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofKI Cable was founded in 1981 and has always strived for the best, most advanced products. We invest in R&D, ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












KT&C Engineering Co.,Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofKT&C was founded in 1996 and has grown quickly to become a global leader that leads the security and ...
Seoul, South Korea












INNOCE
Manufacture & Export ofLED INDUSTRIAL LIGHT, LED FLOOD LIGHT,LED OFFICE LIGHT,LED STREET LIGHT,LED STREET LIGHT,LED LIGHTING Based on ...
Daegu, South Korea












DPAMS
Manufacture & Export ofWe, DEPAMS, specialize in manufacturing of Connector Parts, I/C Test Socket Parts, Precision Plastic & Stamping...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












GASUNG PAK CO., LTD.
Manufacture & Export ofSince established the company on January , 1992, we at Gasung Pak, CO., Ltd., have steadily grown based on our ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












TFO
Manufacture & Export ofTaihan Fiberoptics is the world leader in optical communication cableand systems industry The company was ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












SAERON STEEL
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea












SPEEL
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












KEYANG
Manufacture & Export ofKeyang Electric Machinery was established in 1977. We are pioneers inthe electronic tool industry and are ...
Seoul, South Korea












FLUXLITE Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of-Electric lighting equipment, light emitting diode (LED), indoor -Lighting equipment, factory -Electric ...
Gangwon-do, South Korea












VITZRO TECH
Manufacture & Export ofVITZROTECH has a historical tradition of technology. VITZROTECH is a company which is specialized in ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












KTC Tech
Manufacture & Export ofBattery chargers for mobile telephones
Gangwon-do, South Korea












CS Technology Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of # About company We are leading the LED lighting market after acquiring KS and efficient authentication about ...
Gyeongsangbuk-do, South Korea












Sion Lighting
Manufacture & Export ofSion Lighting is a manufacturer of lighting devices that are applied to houses, buildings and hotels. It has ...
Incheon, South Korea












TECHWON
Manufacture & Export ofThe Solar Powered LED Street Light and Power LED Street Light becoming a very promising business, we constantly...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea












Firstpower Korea
Gangwon-do, South Korea












DAE-SHIN ELECTRIC WIRE CO., LTD.
Manufacture & Export of-Electric wires and cables, insulated (cont'd) -Wire, heat or flame resistant insulated, electric -Wires ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












SUNKWANG
Seoul, South Korea












bulrandia
Manufacture & Export of# About bulrandiaOur company is a company that makes light after the current Jeju Island, Japan, to participate...
Jeju, South Korea












MIRAELED Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of# About MIRAELED Co., Ltd. MIRAE LED Co., Ltd. was established in February 2008 and acquired ISO 9001, CE, FCC,...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Solar Science
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












FA Inc.
Manufacture & Export of # About FA Inc. We are manufacturer of Alcohol Swab, Alcohol Tissue and First Aid Kit in Korea. We provides ...
Chungcheongnam-do, South Korea












SEOJEON ELECTRIC MACHINERY CO..LTD.
Manufacture & Export ofCerebro is the best supportive partner for you to make a good business portfolio for your auto parts business. ...
GYEONGGI-DO, South Korea












LIG Special Purpose Acquisition 2nd Co.. Ltd.
SEOUL, South Korea












FASOO.COM Co.. Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofWe're a leading producer & exporter of plastic bag making machines inKorea since 1986. We're making 3...
SEOUL, South Korea












Wooyoung
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












SOLAR TECH
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












BITKOR
Manufacture & Export of LED Lantern BITKOR has been produced high quality Lanternproducts such as LED Lantern, Emergency LED Light, ...
Daejeon, South Korea








1

...

5


10


12


13


14


15


16


17



                                        Back to top





















Other activity and region match your search criteria






Activity sectors list





Electrical equipment. Nuclear equipment South Korea (467)

Electronic equipment. Telecommunications equipment South Korea (1983)

Measuring and testing equipment South Korea (830)

Optical, photographic and cinematographic equipment South Korea (460)




















				                Frequent updates ensuring high quality data






                                    Secure online payment






                                Help with expert advice






    	            			Dedicated customer service team













Need advice?




+82 2 2200 0800





Contact us





Join us
Follow our latest news on social media



















































    STMicroelectronics N.V. - Strategy and SWOT Report
























Login -
  My basket -
  




EUR GBP 


























STMicroelectronics N.V. - Strategy and SWOT Report

December 2015
41 pages
MarketLine
        

Report ID: 3695896



Summary
Table of contents
Search Inside


IntroductionSTMicroelectronics N.V.  - Strategy and SWOT Report, is a source of comprehensive company data and information. The report covers the company’s structure, operation, SWOT analysis, product and service offerings and corporate actions, providing a 360? view of the company.Features: - Detailed information on STMicroelectronics N.V. required for business and competitor intelligence needs - A study of the major internal and external factors affecting STMicroelectronics N.V. in the form of a SWOT analysis - An in-depth view of the business model of STMicroelectronics N.V. including a breakdown and examination of key business segments - Intelligence on STMicroelectronics N.V.’s mergers and acquisitions (M&A), strategic partnerships and alliances, capital raising, private equity transactions, and financial and legal advisors - News about STMicroelectronics N.V., such as business expansion, restructuring, and contract wins - Large number of easy-to-grasp charts and graphs that present important data and key trendsHighlights:STMicroelectronics N.V. (STMicroelectronics or “the company”) is a semiconductor company that designs, develops, manufactures and markets a range of semiconductor products. Its key products include automotive, microcontrollers, smart power, digital consumer and micro-electro-mechanical systems (MEMS) and sensors. The company primarily operates in the US, Europe and Asia. It is headquartered in Geneva, Switzerland and employed about 43,620 people as on December 31, 2014.  The company recorded revenues of $7,404 million during the financial year ended December 2014 (FY2014), a decrease of 8.4% as compared to FY2013. The operating profit of the company was $168 million in FY2014, as compared to an operating loss of $465 million in FY2013. The net profit of the company was $128 million in FY2014, as compared to a net loss of $500 million in FY2013.Reasons to Purchase: - Gain understanding of STMicroelectronics N.V. and the factors that influence its strategies  - Track strategic initiatives of the company and latest corporate news and actions  - Assess STMicroelectronics N.V. as a prospective partner, vendor or supplier - Support sales activities by understanding your customers' businesses better - Stay up to date on STMicroelectronics N.V.’s business structure, strategy and prospects
	

		Company OverviewBusiness DescriptionHistoryKey Employees and BiographiesCompany ViewLocations and SubsidiariesSWOT AnalysisRevenue AnalysisKey CompetitorsMajor Products and Services
	







            Loading...
          


            We are very sorry, but an error occurred.
            Please contact support@reportbuyer.com if the problem remains.
          









Immediate delivery






              $ 175 - 1 User License
              

              $ 350 - Site License
              

              $ 525 - Corporate License
              




Get Report
Pay by invoice
Get a quote



 Veronica helps you find the right report:

+1 718 213 4904
Contact by email




FAQ

Delivery time
User license
Payment options



Testimonials







The market research advisor answered my questions quickly and professionally. ReportBuyer's team did their best to ensure that I felt comfortable before making the investment to purchase the report.


Cristian Nunez
          Director of Corporate Development Chugach Alaska Corporation
        



My overall experience with ReportBuyer today has been very positive, and I must thank you for your patience (...). Also, the sample you sent me and the explanations provided were very helpful.


D. Lescuyer
          Executive Vice President Oral Business at Skyepharma
        



The research specialist was very helpful, and proposed the best content for my needs.
ReportBuyer also offered a great follow-up, thanks for everything !


P. Thompson
          EMEA Managing Director
        



We were satisfied with the support that ReportBuyer's team provided. Thanks to their recommendations, the report we purchased provided exactly what we want.


Y. Wang
          Business Analyst
        



We didn't have time to do the research internally, and thanks to ReportBuyer's team we were able to find the appropriate data.


S. Chen
          Research Coordinator
        



I was impressed by the customer service: it was fast, responsive, and 100% professional !


D. Krivan
          Market Research Analyst
        



The research specialist provided prompt and helpful service. He also followed up to ensure I had all the information to deliver my business development plan.


C. Adams
          Senior Business Development Manager
        












Our reports have been used by over 10K customers, including:









































































Related reports and data






            Topics
                            related to
                                        
        Semiconductor
    




        Active Component
    



        Diode
    



        Electronic Component
    



        Electronics Manufacturing
    



        LED
    



        Microchip
    



        Optoelectronics
    



        Printed Circuit Board
    



        Sensor
    



        Transistor
    






            Parent Industry        


Electronics Manufacturing







            Related Industries
        


Electrical Equipment


Furniture Manufacturing


Industrial Equipment


Metal Manufacturing


Packaging


Printing


Publishing


Shipbuilding


















                    Advantest Corporation, Wright Investors' Service
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    68 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for Advantest Corporation  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact...
                                            
















                    New Japan Radio Company Limited
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    68 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for New Japan Radio Company Limited  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including...
                                            
















                    Ccs Incorporated
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    68 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for Ccs Incorporated  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact information,...
                                            
















                    Daitron Co Ltd
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    69 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for Daitron Co Ltd  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact information,...
                                            
















                    Amazing Microelectronic Corp
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    66 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for Amazing Microelectronic Corp  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including...
                                            
















                    Satori Electric Co., Ltd.
                

 90
 99
 77

                                    68 pages •
                                By Wright Investors' Service 
                •     Aug 2017

            


                                                    A textual analysis of the financial results for Satori Electric Co., Ltd.  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact...
                                            





More…





        Industry=ElectronicsManufacturing ParentIndustry=Manufacturing Date=201512 Topic=SWOTAnalysis Publisher=MarketLine Price=1000
    












 



            Companies - Electrical, Electronics & Optical ㅣKompass Business Directory



































































                    Company directory and business data solutions



About Kompass







                                        Register






                                        Login







                                                    Login
×



                                                    Please fill in your login and password







Register
Login


Forgot your password ?


























								English

























Need advice?
Please contact one of our team of experts from Monday to Friday between 9am and 5pm or by email




+82 2 2200 0800





Contact us











                    Search across 10.5 million selected companies  in more than  60 countries.

















or




all
suppliers
one company











Rechercher















                                    Data Access



Business solutions 
Sales leads? Online promotion?


EasyBusiness
Direct Marketing
EasyList

                                   Digital solutions
Booster
Promotional solutions
Register your company




See all business solutions

Videos & Tutorials

Quizz




EasyBusiness
Find the right sales leads!

                                With more than 10.5 million companies and 60 search criteria, our global B2B database, EasyBusiness, will help you find the right customer leads and marketing lists.
Find out more >


EasyList
Need help with finding prospects?
EasyList is our straightforward on demand tool designed to help you build personalised company lists from a global database of 9 million companies.
Find out more


Direct Marketing
The precision tool designed to help you find new prospects!
This powerful tool will help you refine and focus your prospecting activities, with many features to help improve the impact of your sales and marketing campaigns.
Find out more >


Register your company
Build your free company profile!
If you are looking to expand into new markets or want to grow your sales activity, then register your company free of charge on the global Kompass B2B directory.
Find out more >


Booster
Engage your target audience!
Engage your target audience and attract new business leads using the Kompass.com our global online digital directory. With over 6m visitors per month from 69 countries worldwide, let us improve your SEO and increase your customer traffic.
Find out more >


Promotional solutions
Attract relevant enquiries!
Build, enhance and manage your company profile to attract visitors instantly. Use our PPC experts to help drive relevant enquiries through to your profile – cost effective, managed and GUARANTEED.
Find out more >


















Electrical, Electronics & Optical




                                    One of the most remarkable success stories of South Korea’s industrialization has been the electronics industry. Along with South Korea’s economic growth, demand for electricity sees CAGR of 8% over 2007-2012, reaching Won47.5 trillion. Nuclear energy produces 30% of country’s electricity with further prospects for growth, as it remains the best alternative in terms of cost and carbon footprint ratio for natural resources-deprived South Korea. Total sales of consumer electronics returned to positive volume growth in 2015, after declines in the previous three years. Wearable electronics, OLED TVs and Windows-based tablets displayed impressive growth rates in 2015. These product groups are expected to lead volume growth during the forecast period. Volume sales of consumer electronics are expected to grow over the forecast period. Based on their recent development pace and the potential demand, growth is expected to accelerate over the coming years. Electrical equipment and Optical business for engines and vehicles market in South Korea also have had a strong performance of domestic automotive manufacturing industry.Kompass Business DirectoryWith over 3,800 South Korean companies registered in the Kompass B2B worldwide database, the Electrical, Electronics & Optical sector represents large activity sectors within our database. This family includes nuclear, telecommunication, testing, measuring, and photographic erumpent, etc.

More
Reduce





                    Electrical, Electronics  & Optical





                        South Korea













Busan (96)

Chungcheongbuk-do (81)

Chungcheongnam-do (232)

Daegu (102)

Daejeon (95)

Gangwon-do (35)

Gwangju (50)

Gyeonggi-do (1303)

Gyeongsangbuk-do (75)

Gyeongsangnam-do (79)

Incheon (221)

Jeju-do (1)

Jeollabuk-do (43)

Jeollanam-do (19)

Seoul (1229)

Ulsan (19)


1








Electrical equipment. Nuclear equipment South Korea (1323)

Electronic equipment. Telecommunications equipment South Korea (1983)

Measuring and testing equipment South Korea (830)

Optical, photographic and cinematographic equipment South Korea (460)



1




3757 

                            Companies match your search criteria



 

Buy this prospect list





x


Every month we have millions of visitors on Kompass, looking for companies like yours. Register your company on Kompass and build your FREE company profile to attract those visitors.


Register


Login


Login


















Hippo LED
LED, Fixture, Linear Lighting Fixture, Light, Linear Light, Floodlight, Panel, Panel Light, Ceiling Light, Light Fixture, Downlight, ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 899 5065








                        Email

Free















TAE YOUNG PRECISION M/C
heavy duty industrial gearing, worm reducer, worm gear, worm reducer,double work reducer, bevel reducer, steel mill spiral bevel gear,...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 584 9033~6








                        Email

Free















East Sea Corporation
Tuyere mornitoring system, Supamic filter, Mill scale Plant,industrial filters,filter bag,filtration process,mill scale,hydraulic ...
Gyeongsangbuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 54 282 0151








                        Email

Free















J-One Co., Ltd.
Box coder, INK-JET Printer, XAAR HEAD, oil base ink, HP cartridge, INK-JET Marking, solvent ink, water base ink, TIJ printer,DOD type ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 458 9300








                        Email

Free















SunJe Hi-Tek Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofx-ray tube, x-ray ionizer, x-ray production, x-ray tube parts, x-ray tube components, ego blower, cordless snow...
Busan, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 51 720 7500








                        Email

Free















DAE SUNG E.N.G
control panel, vortex cooler, cabinet fan, windows control panel, cabinet cooler, cabinet cooling fan, cabinet cooling system, ...
Busan, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 51 819 0425








                        Email

Free















Sam Myung Tech
Electric Under Floor Heating System, Under Floor Heating System, Under Floor Heating, Floor Heating, Electric Heating, Heating Pipe, ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 768 4121








                        Email

Free















Masang Machinery Co., Ltd.
Mold Temperature Controller, MTC, Chiller, Mold Preheating, Scale-Free Equipment, Scale-Free Soft Water Feeder, High Speed Cycle ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 456 7353








                        Email

Free















LINKOPTICS Corp.
medical devices, medical instruments, medical machines, skin care devices, skin care machines, skin care instruments, optics-based ...
Gwangju, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 062 971 5664








                        Email

Free















INA Inc.
defroster, mult-microwave, multi function microwave oven, microwave oven, built in microwave, convection microwave, best microwave ...
Gwangju, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 951 9371








                        Email

Free















KAITECH Inc
Manufacture & Export of# Company Information KAITECH which develops advanced and inventive automotive products focused on advanced ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 63 214 9747








                        Email

Free















Sambo Hitech Co., Ltd.
CCTV camera, Security camera, Network camera, IP camera, Dome camera,Vandalproof camera, box camera, Bullet camera, IR camera, ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 863 3300








                        Email

Free















Bitek Technology Inc.
Laser label cutter, portable laser cutter, desktop laser cutter, tabletop laser cutter, small laser cutter, laser die cutting, die ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 70 4035 4565








                        Email

Free















Hieltec Co., Ltd
backup camera, rear view camera, wireless backup camera, backup camera system, aftermarket backup camera, car reverse camera, backup ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 451 2314








                        Email

Free















INMOK CO., LTD.
Real Wood Case, Mobile Phone Case, Ring Stand, Ring holder, Smartphone Accessories, Wireless Accessories, Wood Accessories, Unique ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 819 2450








                        Email

Free















Seki Controls Co., Ltd.
Introduction# Company InformationWe, at SEKI CONTROLS CO., LTD., specializein manufacturing bimetallic thermal protector and ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 493-2900








                        Email

Free















Daijin Elesys
ACB. ATS, AISS, LBS, Switch Gear, construction materials, switch, acb, circuit breaker, load break switch, auto transfer switch, ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 451 5355








                        Email

Free















Dongyoung Media co.,Ltd
Kitchen TV, Bathroom phone, Kitchen IoT, Digital door lock, door lever, Smart door lock, Bluetooth door lock. Finger print recognition...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 458 1121








                        Email

Free















Myungshin Medical Co., Ltd
Diet, Fat down, Pain relief, Weight control, Relieve Stress, diet, pain relief, relieve stress, weight control, fat down, weight loss,...
Gwangju, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 971 8056








                        Email

Free















ICEPIPE Corporation
Electrical LED lamps, lighting equipment, light emitting diode, LED, Electric lighting equipment, indoor Lamps with light emitting ...
Seoul, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 2 861 0010








                        Email

Free















MU SOLVERS CO., LTD.
speakers, horn speaker, ceiling speaker, lucid, LUCID speaker, bluetooth speakers, surround sound systems, wireless bluetooth speakers...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 70 7435 8531








                        Email

Free















AVA Vision Inc.
sensor, intuit, display, sensor, signage, lightbox, touch lamp, touchscreen monitor, motion sensor, digital signage, led signs, ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 4433311








                        Email

Free















Servan Co., Ltd.
Manufacture of General Purpose Machinery
Busan, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 51 831 7676








                        Email

Free















Hansung Industry
pump, submersible pump, industrial pumps, large scale pump, water pump, submersible water pump, sump pump, submersible well pump, ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 63 441-9127








                        Email

Free















ELCOMTECH Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofit,digital convergence,innovation,receiver,cpu,transmitter,broadcast operator,data broadcasting it convergence,...
Daejeon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 42 824-0120








                        Email

Free















NRTEC Co., Ltd.
# Info NRTEC specializes in the design and manufacturing of gas turbine generator system as well as silencers for power plants and ...
Gyeongsangnam-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 55 313 4567








                        Email

Free















PKFC Co.,Ltd
Manufacture & Export ofArrayautomobile parts, electronic parts, structure-fixing products including Chassis, ENG, Bumper, and Power ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 815 7540








                        Email

Free















i2A Systems
Manufacture & Export ofsmart factory, iot based solutions, wearable device, sensor, ion battery, electronics, sensor, IoT based ...
Daejeon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 42 864-1205








                        Email

Free















SJINNO TECH Co., Ltd
slide conveyor,innotech pcb,smt ,smt screen printer,screen printe,gate conveyor,sj innotech,cooling conveyor,Screen Printer, SMT, ...
Daegu, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 70 5012 9707








                        Email

Free















NULSOM INC.
Manufacture & Export ofsmart factory, iot based solutions, wearable device, sensor Ion battery, electronics, ESP32, WiFi, Bluetooth, ...
Daejeon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 42 710 2580








                        Email

Free















Suin System
SMD CHIP SAMPLE KIT MANUFACTURE, Chip Resistor Assortment Kit, register, chip register kit, smd register kit #Main ProductsSMD SMT ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 8741020








                        Email

Free















W&P KOREA
Agitator, Heavy Duty Sewage Pump, High-head Sewage Pump, Sewage Vortex Pump #Company Introduction WATER & PEOPLE KOREA, anenterprise ...
Incheon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 32 8113378








                        Email

Free















OPTOLOGICS CO., LTD
ZOOM LENS, ZOOM CAMERA MODULE, FIXED LENS, INTRA ORAL AF SYSTEM, FIXED CAMERA, IR ZOOMING ILLUMINATOR, VIDEO MAGNIFIER, DRONE, IMAGE ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 70 7864439








                        Email

Free















Costech Inc.
short circuit, infrared camera, wireless rear view camera, assistant parking, backup camera, rear view camera, wireless backup camera,...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 63 4681669








                        Email

Free















JY Technology Inc.
Arc power supply, Linear Ion source, sputter cathode, sputter magnetron, circular arc cathode, rectangular arc cathode , Plasma source...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 4272292








                        Email

Free















GOT.,Co.Ltd.
fiber cable, optical fibre cable, korean optical cable, korean optical fiber cable, optical cable, fiber optic cable, fiber optic, ...
Jeollanam-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 4336000








                        Email

Free















JAEWON Co., Ltd
Stages, Precision positioning Stage, Positioning stage, Precision Stage, High Precision Stage, Linear Stage, Translation stage, Manual...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 4777333








                        Email

Free















Dae-Gyoung Industrial electronics
Photovoltaic system, distributing board, motor control board, panel board, Renewable Energy, Solar energy generation system, Energy ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 63 2149911








                        Email

Free















MIDC OF HANBAT NATIONAL UNIVERSITY
# MIDC introduction The manufacturing Innovation Development Corporation of Hanbat National University (MIDC) was launched Aug 2015. ...
Daejeon, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 42 939 4732








                        Email

Free















DAEGYEONG AT
rov,terminal partrevolt,wire connectors,ac compressor,fha,cable connectors,battery terminal,regulator,social housing,underwater drone,...
Gwangju, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 973 8185








                        Email

Free















ASIA Co.,Ltd.
fences, wire fence, mesh fence, flower fence, flower mesh fence, fencing, fence panels, garden fencing, garden fence, vinyl fencing, ...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 63 263 8250








                        Email

Free















NORMA
Security, Wireless, IoT, Internet of Things, Substitutional goods of WIPS,Vulnerability, Scanner, AtEar, NORMA, MoVi, Mobile Vaccine, ...
Seoul, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 2 923 1988








                        Email

Free















Thebit
Manufacture & Export of# Company Information TheBit is a company that was founded in 2004 by engineers from Samsung Electronics. ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 2 862 0485








                        Email

Free















Ecube Labs Co., Ltd.
# Company Introduction Ecube Labs provides a complete waste management solution, consisting of Clean CUBE (solar-powered waste ...
Seoul, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 21090293








                        Email

Free















PHOTONICS TRADE GROUP CORP.
Ceiling lights, high CRI, architectural led lighting, luxury led lighting, retail led light, mill-works lighting, chandelier, pendant ...
Gwangju, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 236 2050








                        Email

Free















DaehanCVD Co.,Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofball valve, check valve, globe valve, swing check valve, angle valve ,valve, foot valve, ball valve ...
Chungcheongbuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 43 267 0849








                        Email

Free















Jiscop Co., Ltd.
ceramic bracket, sapphire bracket, mono-crystal sapphire bracket, metal bracket, beetle, buccal tube, archwires(NiTi superelastic, SS,...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 452 2808








                        Email

Free















HYUNSUNGAUTOTECH.CO.LTD
ramen cooker, noodle cooker, automatic induction cooker, induction cooktop, induction stove, induction cooker, induction cookware, ...
Jeollanam-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 62 9426259








                        Email

Free















SUNG HYUN CO.,, LTD.
vessel, heater, fabrication, feedwater heater, steam generator boiler, preheating the feed water, steam generator, steam boiler, water...
Jeollabuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 063 4641110








                        Email

Free















CONOTEC CO., LTD.
digital temperature controller, pid temperature controller, temperature controllers, co2 generator, temperature transmitter, ...
Busan, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 70 7815 8289








                        Email

Free















GA Co,. Ltd
LED Street light, LED Security light, LED Tunnerl light, LED Park light, LED Flood light, LED Factory light, LED Crossing walk light, ...
Gangwon-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 33 734 5000








                        Email

Free















TWO H Chem Ltd.
Polyethylene fine powder - twohchem, with years of experience in the Expert, professional of Polyethylene fine powder, Providing ...
Chungcheongbuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 43 832 6760








                        Email

Free















3RLab,Inc.
High Voltage Resistors, Non-inductive Resistors, Thicker Film Resistors, Voltage divider, Voltage Prove, Resistor, High Frequency ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 31 429 6379








                        Email

Free















Korea Environmental Industry & Technology Institute - KEITI
01. Handok Clean Tech Co., Ltd._Carbon Block Filter, Carbon Block, Compressed, Water, Filter, Chlorine, CTO, VOC, Lead, Arsenic, ...
Seoul, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 2 3800 500








                        Email

Free















J-Lighting co., ltd
streetlight, park lamp, solar light, security light, cctv light, street cctv light, landscape lighting, lighting fixture, ceiling ...
Gyeongsangbuk-do, South Korea






                                    Phone number






                                        +82 54 9565600








                        Email

Free















Semisysco Co.,Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Semiconductor Making MachineryManufacture & Export ofSemiconductor Equipment,Fame Display EquipmentManufacture...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












SHILLA FIRE Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of[nozzle & water spray nozzle] -Branch pipe -Nozzle Tip(fog&straight stream) -Nozzle tip(Straingt stream) -water...
Incheon, South Korea












SIGNET SYSTEMS INC.
Manufacture & Export of Automatic Voltage Regulator Battery Charger Uninterrupted Power SystemManufacture & Export ofBattery Charger,...
Jeollanam-do, South Korea












SYhitech.com
Manufacture & Export of Sensors - Humidity Sensor - Pressure Sensor Energy Storage DevicesManufacture & Export ofSensor,ESD,Applied ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












TNC.ltd
Manufacture & Export of Choke Coil EMI/EMC FilterManufacture & Export ofLine Filter,EMI Filter,Choke CoilManufacture & Export of32602 ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












unibini
Manufacture & Export ofElectronic Monitoring System Talking and singing toothbrush,HomeElectronic Monitoring unit Singing Smart ...
Seoul, South Korea












Asia Yamaichi Electronics Inc.
Manufacture & Export of Test And Burn-In Products - Pga/Zif - Bga/Micro Bga - Simm/Dimm - Qfp - Plcc - Lcc - Tab - Kgd - Mcr - Sop - ...
Chungcheongbuk-do, South Korea












ACOH Semiconductor Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Power Module Application Power PCB COB(Chip on Board)Manufacture & Export ofPower Module
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












AJ Networks Co.,Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of CRT socket for TV, Jacks & connectors, Remote control unit, Other assembliesManufacture & Export ofMeasure ...
Seoul, South Korea












Elcomtec Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Electro-Luminescence Back Light Unit CCM Products - Mega - VGAManufacture & Export ofCompact Camera Module,Key...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Inter-M Corporation
Manufacture & Export of Commercial Audio Professional Audio Cctv System
Seoul, South Korea












Mega Power Tech
Manufacture & Export of Manufacturer of - on line cable insulation monitor - cable fault locator - softstarters for motor - SCR heater...
Seoul, South Korea












DAE SUNG MAREF
Manufacture & Export of Medical equipments (Circulation & drainage) Air compression therapy (IPC) devices Physiotherapy devices DVT ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












I DO IT CO.,LTD.
Manufacture & Export of-Flat Satellite Antenna -Mobile Satellite System -SNIPE -AVN : Smart car AV & Navigation -Car-STB : car set top...
Seoul, South Korea












JDC Tech Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of - Combi Card (Dual Interface Cards) - Smart Card - RF Cards (Contactless Cards) - MIFARE Cards - Memory Cards ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Inzi Controls Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of Cooling System Valves & Actuators Engin Management System Switch & Sensors Engineering Plastic ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Eul Ji Electric Mfg Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of A.C MotorManufacture & Export ofInduction Motor
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












With Solution Inc.
Manufacture & Export ofMini Compact DVR, Compact DVR, Wall Mount DVR, Vehicle DVR Mini Compact DVR, Compact DVR, Wall Mount DVR, ...
Gwangju, South Korea












Jejoong Medical Co Ltd
Manufacture & Export of Medical film view box - X-ray Viewingbox - X-ray Light Box - Illuminator - Film Illuminators - X-ray ...
Gangwon-do, South Korea












Tap Electronics Ind. Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of The global environments are getting sick more and more due to the progress of industry and the rapid changes ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Korea First Telecom
Manufacture & Export of Repeater - RF Repeater - Telematics
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












Sungjae Industries
Manufacture & Export of -Manufacture & Export ofFoundry molds
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












N Tech Window Film Co., Ltd.
Manufacture & Export ofAbrasive Paper,Window Solar Film,Window Film,Safety Screen Film,Tinting Film,Safety Film,Decoration Film
Seoul, South Korea












SAM JUNG CO.,Ltd.
Manufacture & Export of VCR Deck mechanisms,Camcorder Deck Mechanisms, Remote ControlsManufacture & Export of32605 / Manufacture of ...
Gyeonggi-do, South Korea












MOPIENS, INC.
Manufacture & Export of Repeater - Optical ModuleManufacture & Export ofBTS Transceiver,Optical Communication Module,RF Repeater,...
Seoul, South Korea












BUYANG INDUSTRIAL Co Ltd
Manufacture & Export of Display - TFT LCD Monitor - CCTV Monitor & Camera
Incheon, South Korea






1


2


3


5


10


15

...

20





                                        Back to top
















                    Kompass services







Other activity and region match your search criteria






Activity sectors list





Agriculture & Food South Korea

Business Services South Korea

Chemicals, Pharmaceuticals & Plastics South Korea

Construction South Korea

Education, Training & Organisations South Korea

Energy, Environment South Korea

IT, Internet, R&D South Korea

Leisure & Tourism South Korea

Metals, Machinery & Engineering South Korea

Minerals South Korea

Paper, Printing, Publishing South Korea

Retail & Traders South Korea

Textiles, Clothing, Leather, Watchmaking, Jewellery South Korea

Transport & Logistics South Korea




















				                Frequent updates ensuring high quality data






                                    Secure online payment






                                Help with expert advice






    	            			Dedicated customer service team













Need advice?




+82 2 2200 0800





Contact us





Join us
Follow our latest news on social media





































































NexStreaming Corporation - Research and Markets

















































































ABOUT US
BLOG
CONTACT US
FAQ























USD
EUR
GBP



USD 
▼

USD
EUR
GBP






€
EUR
$
USD
£
GBP







+353-1-416-8900REST OF WORLD



1-800-526-8630U.S. (TOLL FREE)








 




Advanced








Price:
€75EUR$92USD£70GBP 
View Pricing






 Home
/






Categories
/






Company Reports











 
SELECT A FORMAT








€75EUR$92USD£70GBP



                                                        Single User
                                                         Electronic (PDF)






                                                                            
                                                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product. The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 

                                                







  ADD TO BASKET




                                                                        order by fax
                                        

                                            need a quote ?
                                        



 

OUR CLIENTS












HAVE A QUESTION?
EMAIL US
VIEW FAQs



RECENTLY VIEWED PRODUCTS











Partner of Research and MarketsVACCINATING 40,000 CHILDREN IN 2017





WHY CHOOSE RESEARCH AND MARKETS?



WORLD'S LARGEST SELECTION




TRUSTED BY THE BEST




CUSTOMER FOCUSED




SAFE & SECURE







We found Research and Markets easy to use, which saved us a lot of time. In the future when we seek market

                         insights, especially in the field of medical applications, we will come to Research and Markets.
                        
                    



                            READ MORE
                        


Dr Tomasz Zawada
Engineering and Research Manager
Meggitt A/S















NexStreaming Corporation



ID: 2784930
Company Profile
July 2017
67 Pages

Wright Investors Service                                











DESCRIPTION


TABLE OF CONTENTS


SAMPLES



                                                                COUNTRIES COVERED
                                                            


FORMATS







1 of 5








                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                A textual analysis of the financial results for NexStreaming Corporation  compared to selected competitors. Also included are quantitative analyses of the company's financial statements, extensive ratio analyses and up to 10-year history of sales, earnings, dividends and security pricing. A business description of the company, including contact information, senior officers and Wright Quality Rating analyses is also provided.Quantitative analyses of financial statements (Income Statement, Balance Sheet and Sources of Capital), extensive ratio tables (Accounting, Asset Utilization, Employee Efficiency, Fixed Charges Coverage, Leverage Analysis, Liquidity Analysis, Per-share Data and Profitability Analysis) and proprietary Wright Quality Rating® analyses tables. The Wright Quality Rating measures the liquidity of the stock and the financial strength, profitability and corporate growth characteristics of NexStreaming Corporation A textual review of the financial results of NexStreaming Corporation versus IOK Company Co Ltd, Chips&Media Inc and Mobileleader Company., Limited is includedrepo.   The comparative analysis,of these companies,compares Sales, Company Valuations and Financial Position. Also included for NexStreaming Corporation are: Company Description, Recent Stock Performance, Profitability Analysis, Dividend Analysis, and key data items. Additional research for NexStreaming Corporation includes tables with up to 10-years of history of computed ratios, sales, earnings, and security prices. The company’s financial results are compared in a series of reports (i.e. financial statements, sales, key ratios, etc.) to global industry averages.
                                                                            

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




2 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                    Company FundamentalsCompany ProfileComparative Business AnalysisSummary Analysis per ShareSales AnalysisPrice AnalysisEarnings and Dividends AnalysisFinancial Statement AnalysesBalance Sheet - Common SizeBalance Sheet - Year-Year Percent ChangeBalance Sheet - Five-Year AveragesIncome Statement - Common SizeIncome Statement - Year-Year Percent ChangeIncome Statement - Five-Year AveragesSources of CapitalFinancial Ratio AnalysesAccounting RatiosAsset UtilizationEmployee EfficiencyFixed Charges CoverageLeverage AnalysisLiquidity AnalysisPer-Share DataProfitability AnalysisWright Quality Rating AnalysesInvestment AcceptanceFinancial StrengthProfitability and StabilityCorporate Growth

Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




3 of 5





LOADING...







4 of 5







                            LOGIN TO ACCESS EXECUTIVE SUMMARY
                        



                            PRINTER FRIENDLY
                        



                            PRINTABLE PDF BROCHURE
                        

SEND TO A FRIEND






                                                                                    Korea (South)
                                                                                
Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown




5 of 5






Note: Product cover images may vary from those shown








RELATED PRODUCTS 







G-treeBNT Co Ltd


 Company Profile
68 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Secuve Co Ltd


 Company Profile
66 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Hancom Secure Inc


 Company Profile
69 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Barunson Entertainment & Arts Corp


 Company Profile
68 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Turbotek Company Limited


 Company Profile
56 Pages
August 2014






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







HansolNexG Co Ltd


 Company Profile
68 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Nex Metals Exploration Limited


 Company Profile
67 Pages
June 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







NexJ Systems Inc


 Company Profile
67 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Hancom GMD Inc


 Company Profile
70 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







Rsupport Co Ltd


 Company Profile
66 Pages
July 2017






€75EUR$92USD£70GBP








 close

NexStreaming Corporation



 close

ASK A QUESTION

*Required Information
 
Product: NexStreaming Corporation


YOUR QUESTION*







YOUR CONTACT DETAILS*

Title
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name




Last Name




Email Address




Country
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




Phone Number



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998












We request your telephone number so we can contact you in the event we have difficulty reaching you via email.
                    We aim to respond to all questions on the same business day.





 



 close

SEND TO A FRIEND

* Required Information
 FRIEND'S DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*




Message to friend




YOUR CONTACT DETAILS

Full Name*




Email Address*













 


 close

Request a Quote

 
Please complete the below form and click "send request" to obtain a pdf quotation and order form.
This document will be available for immediate download and will also be emailed to you.
            
* Required Information


YOUR ADDRESS

Address 1*




Address 2




Address 3




City*




Postal/ZIP Code




Country*
Please Select
------------------------------
United States
United Kingdom
Germany
Canada
Australia
------------------------------
Afghanistan
Albania
Algeria
American Samoa
Andorra
Angola
Anguilla
Antarctica-Casey
Antarctica-Scott
Antigua and Barbuda
Argentina
Armenia
Aruba
Ascension Island
Ashmore and Cartier Islands
Atlantic East
Atlantic West
Australia
Austria
Azerbaijan
Bahamas
Bahrain
Bangladesh
Barbados
Belarus
Belgium
Belize
Benin
Bermuda
Bhutan
Bolivia
Bosnia and Herzegovina
Botswana
Brazil
British Virgin Islands
Brunei
Bulgaria
Burkina Faso
Burma
Burundi
Cambodia
Cameroon
Canada
Cape Verde
Cayman Islands
Central African Republic
Chad
Chile
China
Christmas Island
Clipperton Island
Cocos (Keeling) Islands
Colombia
Comoros
Congo
Cook Islands
Costa Rica
Croatia
Cuba
Curaco 
Cyprus
Czech Republic
Democratic Republic of Congo
Denmark
Djibouti
Dominica
Dominican Republic
East Timor
Ecuador
Egypt
El Salvador
Equatorial Guinea
Eritrea
Estonia
Ethiopia
Falkland Islands (Islas Malvinas)
Faroe Islands
Fiji Islands
Finland
France
French Guiana
French Polynesia
Gabon
Gambia
Gaza Strip
Georgia
Germany
Ghana
Gibraltar
Greece
Greenland
Grenada
Guadeloupe
Guam
Guatemala
Guinea
Guinea-Bissau
Guyana
Haiti
Honduras
Hong Kong
Hungary
Iceland
India
Indonesia
Iran
Iraq
Ireland
Israel
Italy
Ivory Coast
Ivory Coast (Cote d'Ivoire)
Jamaica
Japan
Jordan
Kazakhstan
Kenya
Kiribati
Kosovo
Kuwait
Kyrgyzstan
Laos
Latvia
Lebanon
Lesotho
Liberia
Libya
Liechtenstein
Lithuania
Luxembourg
Macau
Macedonia
Madagascar
Malawi
Malaysia
Maldives
Mali
Malta
Marshall Islands
Martinique
Mauritania
Mauritius
Mayotte Islands
Mexico
Micronesia
Moldova
Monaco
Mongolia
Montenegro
Montserrat
Morocco
Mozambique
Myanmar
Namibia
Nauru
Nepal
Netherlands
Netherlands Antilles
New Caledonia
New Zealand
Nicaragua
Niger
Nigeria
Niue
Norfolk Islands
North Korea
Northern Ireland
Northern Marianas
Norway
Oman
Pakistan
Palau
Palestine
Panama
Papua New Guinea
Paraguay
Peru
Philippines
Poland
Portugal
Puerto Rico
Qatar
Reunion
Romania
Russia
Rwanda
Saint Christopher Nevis
Saint Helena
Saint Kitts and Nevis
Saint Lucia
Saint Martin
Saint Vincent and the Grenadines
Samoa
San Marino
Sao Tome
Saudi Arabia
Scotland
Senegal
Serbia
Serbia and Montenegro
Seychelles
Sierra Leone
Singapore
Sint Maarten
Slovakia
Slovenia
Solomon Islands
Somalia
South Africa
South Korea
Spain
Sri Lanka
Sudan
Suriname
Swaziland
Sweden
Switzerland
Syria
Tahiti
Taiwan
Tajikistan
Tanzania
Thailand
Togo
Trinidad and Tobago
Tunisia
Turkey
Turkmenistan
Turks and Caicos Islands
Tuvalu
Uganda
Ukraine
United Arab Emirates
United Kingdom
United States
Uruguay
Uzbekistan
Vanuatu
Vatican City (Holy See)
Venezuela
Vietnam
Virgin Islands
Wallis And Futuna
West Bank
West Indies
Western Sahara
Yemen
Yugoslavia
Zaire
Zambia
Zimbabwe




State





YOUR DETAILS

Title*
Mr
Mrs
Dr
Miss
Ms
Prof




First Name*




Last Name*




Organisation*




Email Address*




Phone Number*



+1
+11
+1-242
+1-246
+1-264
+1-268
+1-284
+1-345
+1-441
+1-473
+1-649
+1-664
+1-670
+1-671
+1-684
+1-758
+1-767
+1-784
+1-787
+1-809
+1-868
+1-869
+1-876
+20
+212
+213
+216
+218
+220
+221
+222
+224
+225
+226
+227
+228
+229
+23
+230
+231
+232
+233
+234
+235
+236
+237
+238
+239
+240
+241
+242
+243
+244
+245
+247
+248
+249
+250
+251
+252
+253
+254
+255
+256
+257
+258
+260
+261
+263
+264
+265
+266
+267
+268
+269
+27
+284
+290
+291
+297
+298
+299
+30
+31
+32
+33
+34
+350
+351
+352
+353
+354
+355
+356
+357
+358
+359
+36
+370
+371
+372
+373
+374
+375
+376
+377
+378
+379
+380
+381
+382
+385
+386
+387
+389
+39
+40
+41
+420
+421
+423
+43
+44
+45
+46
+47
+48
+49
+500
+501
+502
+503
+504
+505
+506
+507
+509
+51
+52
+53
+54
+55
+56
+57
+58
+590
+591
+592
+593
+594
+595
+596
+597
+598
+599
+60
+61
+6101
+62
+63
+64
+65
+66
+670
+672
+673
+674
+675
+677
+678
+679
+680
+681
+682
+683
+685
+686
+687
+688
+689
+691
+692
+7
+81
+82
+84
+850
+852
+853
+855
+856
+86
+869
+871
+874
+880
+886
+90
+91
+92
+93
+94
+95
+960
+961
+962
+963
+964
+965
+966
+967
+968
+970
+971
+972
+973
+974
+975
+976
+977
+98
+992
+993
+994
+995
+996
+998











                                PO Number
                                (if applicable)







PRODUCT FORMAT




License
Format
Properties
Price




 
SINGLE USER Electronic (PDF)                                                



                                            The report will be emailed to you.  The report is sent in PDF format. 
                                        

                                            This is a single user license, allowing one specific user access to the product.
                                        

€75EUR$92USD£70GBP







* The price quoted above is only valid for 30 days. Please submit your order within that time frame to avail of this price as all prices are subject to change.





 



























Hancom GMD, Inc. - Relationship Science
































































                      NEWS HOME
                    

Advertising
Board and Executive Moves
Energy
Health Care
Hedge Funds
M & A
Private Equity
Technology








            You have  
            
9 free profiles

              left this month   
			      

                Start Your Free Trial ➤
              








            Hey, we noticed you're a RelSci Pro subscriber! Would you like to view the page there?
            

                View on RelSci Pro ➤
              





























































































































Email







LinkedIn







Facebook







Google+







Tweet







Reddit





Permalink





Hancom GMD, Inc.



Overview
In The News Executives & Employees Board of Directors Paths
Recent Transactions Transaction Advisors Financials



Hancom GMD, Inc.



 OVERVIEW



Date Founded


1997




Headquarters


5th Floor, Hancom Tower, 49 Daewangpangyo-ro 644beon-gil, Bundang-gu, Seongnam, Gyeonggi 13493




Type of Company



                                                                    Public
                                                            




Employees (Worldwide)


33




Industries


Electrical Products

Wholesale: Industrial Products & Manufacturing

Semiconductors




Company Description


Hancom GMD, Inc. engages in the design, manufacture and sale of integrated circuits. It operates through following business divisions: Forensic, System on Chip, and Lease. Its products include mobile forensic software, mobile forensic hardware, mobile forensic package, and digital forensic software. It also offers services such as MD-forensics, MD-audit, and MD-recovery. The company was founded on January 30, 1997 and is headquartered in Seongnam-si, South Korea.




Website


http://www.hancomgmd.com






 In The News
          See more




Business Wire
June 7, 2017





                        Graaa y Montero Sells Its Stake in GMD to Private Equity Firm Advent International                    





peHUB
August 12, 2015





                        HKW-backed GMD grows patient support footprint with Adjuvantz deal                     






 Executives & Employees



Hyun-Soo Kim

Chief Executive Officer & Director




Seung-Ho Han

Auditor







See our list of current and previous employees when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



                          Board of Directors                        



Sang-Cheol Kim

President at Hancom, Inc.




Sung-Jun Byeon

Senior Executive Director at Hancom, Inc.





Yeon-Soo Kim

Director & Head-Global Business at Hancom, Inc.




Hyun-Soo Kim

Chief Executive Officer & Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.





Gyeong-Rae Kim

Outside Director at Hancom GMD, Inc.







See our list of current and previous board members when you upgrade.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Paths to Hancom GMD, Inc.



                        Hancom GMD, Inc.                    




 You



 Connections via Relationship Science



 Hancom GMD, Inc.






Sync your contacts to see how you can connect with Hancom GMD, Inc..

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 


 Recent Transactions



 Details Hidden



                                    Hancom GMD, Inc. purchases GMD System Co., Ltd.                                                                       




 Details Hidden



                                    Hancom GMD, Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                                                    





 Transaction Advisors



Companies ▾




Underwriter



Kyobo Securities Co., Ltd. (Broker)

                                        Advised on
                                        Hancom GMD, Inc. issued Ordinary Shares                                    





 Key Stats and Financials as of 2016



Market Capitalization


$29.4B




Total Enterprise Value


$47.2B




Earnings Per Share


$-73




Revenue


$15B




Net Profit


$-746M




EBITDA


$437M




EBITDAMargin


2.91%




Total Debt


$20.2B




Total Equity


$41.4B




Three Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


-26.82%




Five Year Compounded Annual Growth Rate Of Revenue


-25.24%




Enterprise Value Sales


3.14x




TEVNet Income


-63.27x




Debt TEV


0.43x




Enterprise Value EBITDAOperating


108.1x






See financial details and more using RelSci Professional.

Start My Free Trial ➤








See  More 


 



You've reached your 10 free profiles limit this month.
Upgrade to RelSci Pro today to enjoy unlimited article views and much more!

Start My Free Trial  ➤

Still not convinced? Check out our full listing of features here.















Are you a RelSci Pro Subscriber?

Login to RelSci Pro 
                        ➤


Not a Pro Subscriber? Log in here to manage your alerts









 Keep me signed in.
        

Login  ➤



        Forgot your Password?
    

























 I have read the LexisNexis terms & conditions




Sign Me Up  ➤













